District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.06

Repealed

General limitations; small purchase procurements.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 306, 32 DCR 7396
Nov. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 10-65, § 602, 40 DCR 7351
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(n), 44 DCR 1423
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.6.